tests/литература.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах литература":
    литература<n><nom> :  литература 
    литература<n><gen> :  литературӑн 
    литература<n><dat> :  литературӑна 
    литература<n><loc> :  литературӑра 
    литература<n><abl> :  литературӑран 
    литература<n><ins> :  литературӑпа 
    литература<n>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑсӑр 
    литература<n><ter> :  литературӑшӑн
    литература<n><px1sg><nom> :  литературӑм 
    литература<n><px1sg><gen> :  литературӑмӑн 
    литература<n><px1sg><dat> :  литературӑма 
    литература<n><px1sg><loc> :  литературӑмра 
    литература<n><px1sg><abl> :  литературӑмран 
    литература<n><px1sg><ins> :  литературӑмпа 
    литература<n><px1sg>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑмсӑр 
    литература<n><px1sg><ter> :  литературӑмшӑн
    литература<n><px2sg><nom> :  литературу 
    литература<n><px2sg><gen> :  литературун 
    литература<n><px2sg><dat> :  литературуна 
    литература<n><px2sg><loc> :  литературунта 
    литература<n><px2sg><abl> :  литературунтан 
    литература<n><px2sg><ins> :  литературупа 
    литература<n><px2sg>+сӑр<post> :  литературусӑр 
    литература<n><px2sg><ter> :  литературушӑн
    литература<n><px3sp><nom> :  литератури 
    литература<n><px3sp><gen> :  литературин 
    литература<n><px3sp><dat> :  литературине 
    литература<n><px3sp><loc> :  литературинче 
    литература<n><px3sp><abl> :  литературинчен 
    литература<n><px3sp><ins> :  литературипе 
    литература<n><px3sp>+сӑр<post> :  литературисӗр 
    литература<n><px3sp><ter> :  литературишӗн
    литература<n><px1pl><nom> :  литературӑмӑр 
    литература<n><px1pl><gen> :  литературӑмӑрӑн 
    литература<n><px1pl><dat> :  литературӑмӑра 
    литература<n><px1pl><loc> :  литературӑмӑрта 
    литература<n><px1pl><abl> :  литературӑмӑртан 
    литература<n><px1pl><ins> :  литературӑмӑрпа 
    литература<n><px1pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑмӑрсӑр 
    литература<n><px1pl><ter> :  литературӑмӑршӑн
    литература<n><px2pl><nom> :  литературӑр 
    литература<n><px2pl><gen> :  литературӑрӑн 
    литература<n><px2pl><dat> :  литературӑра 
    литература<n><px2pl><loc> :  литературӑрта 
    литература<n><px2pl><abl> :  литературӑртан 
    литература<n><px2pl><ins> :  литературӑрпа 
    литература<n><px2pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑрсӑр 
    литература<n><px2pl><ter> :  литературӑршӑн
    литература<n><pl><nom> :  литературӑсем 
    литература<n><pl><gen> :  литературӑсен 
    литература<n><pl><dat> :  литературӑсене 
    литература<n><pl><loc> :  литературӑсенче 
    литература<n><pl><abl> :  литературӑсенчен 
    литература<n><pl><ins> :  литературӑсемпе 
    литература<n><pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑсемсӗр 
    литература<n><pl><ter> :  литературӑсемшӗн
    литература<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  литературӑмсем 
    литература<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  литературӑмсен 
    литература<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  литературӑмсене 
    литература<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  литературӑмсенче 
    литература<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  литературӑмсенчен 
    литература<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  литературӑмсемпе 
    литература<n><px1sg><pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑмсемсӗр 
    литература<n><px1sg><pl><ter> :  литературӑмсемшӗн
    литература<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  литературусем 
    литература<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  литературусен 
    литература<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  литературусене 
    литература<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  литературусенче 
    литература<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  литературусенчен 
    литература<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  литературусемпе 
    литература<n><px2sg><pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературусемсӗр 
    литература<n><px2sg><pl><ter> :  литературусемшӗн
    литература<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  литературисем 
    литература<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  литературисен 
    литература<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  литературисене 
    литература<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  литературисенче 
    литература<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  литературисенчен 
    литература<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  литературисемпе 
    литература<n><px3sp><pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературисемсӗр 
    литература<n><px3sp><pl><ter> :  литературисемшӗн
    литература<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  литературӑмӑрсем 
    литература<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  литературӑмӑрсен 
    литература<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  литературӑмӑрсене 
    литература<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  литературӑмӑрсенче 
    литература<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  литературӑмӑрсенчен 
    литература<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  литературӑмӑрсемпе 
    литература<n><px1pl><pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    литература<n><px1pl><pl><ter> :  литературӑмӑрсемшӗн
    литература<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  литературӑрсем 
    литература<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  литературӑрсен 
    литература<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  литературӑрсене 
    литература<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  литературӑрсенче 
    литература<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  литературӑрсенчен 
    литература<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  литературӑрсемпе 
    литература<n><px2pl><pl>+сӑр<post> :  литературӑрсемсӗр 
    литература<n><px2pl><pl><ter> :  литературӑрсемшӗн
